Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-120
Major component part, defined.

Major component part means an engine, with or without accessories, a transmission, a cowl, a door, a frame, a body, a rear clip, or a nose.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 20.